North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-06 Department of Human Services
50-06-05.1.
Powers and duties of the department. [Effective July 1, 2025]

The department has the following powers and duties to be administered by the department through its state office or regional human service centers, human service zones, or otherwise as directed by the department:

To act as the official agency of the state in any social welfare or human service activity initiated by the federal government not otherwise by law made the responsibility of another state agency.

To administer, allocate, and distribute any state and federal funds that may be made available for the purpose of providing financial assistance, care, and services to eligible persons and families who do not have sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health.

To provide preventive, rehabilitative, and other human services to help families and individuals to retain or attain capability for independence or self-care.

To do needed research and study in the causes of social problems and to define appropriate and effective techniques in providing preventive and rehabilitative services.

To provide for the study, and to promote the well-being, of a child in need of protection, a child in need of services, and delinquent children.

To provide for the placing and supervision of children in need of substitute parental care, subject to the control of any court having jurisdiction and control of any such child.

To recommend appropriate human services related legislation to the legislative assembly.

To direct and supervise human service zone activities and administer a statewide program for state-funded human services, staffing, and administration costs related to the administration of human services.

To secure, hold, and administer for the purpose for which it is established any property and any funds donated to it either by will or deed, or otherwise, or through court order or otherwise available to the department, and to administer those funds or property in accordance with the instructions in the instrument creating them or in accordance with the instructions in the court order or otherwise.

To formulate standards and make appropriate inspections and investigations in accordance with such standards in connection with all licensing activities delegated by law to the department, including early childhood programs, nonmedical adult care facilities and maternity homes, and persons or organizations receiving and placing children, and to require those facilities, persons, and organizations to submit reports and information as the department may determine necessary.

To permit the making of any surveys of human service needs and activities if determined to be necessary.

To issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and compel attendance of witnesses and production of documents or papers whenever necessary in making the investigations provided for herein or in the discharge of its other duties. A subpoena may not be issued to compel the production of documents or papers relating to any private child-caring or child-placing agency or maternity hospital or to compel the attendance as a witness of any officer or employee of those facilities except upon the order of a judge of the district court of the judicial district in which the facilities are located.

To provide insofar as staff resources permit appropriate human services, including social histories, social or social-psychological evaluations, individual, group, family, and marital counseling, and related consultation, when referred by self, parent, guardian, human service zone, court, physician, or other individual or agency, and when application is made by self (if an adult or emancipated youth), parent, guardian, or agency having custody; also, on the same basis, to provide human services to children and adults in relation to their placement in or return from the life skills and transition center, state hospital, or North Dakota youth correctional center.

To provide insofar as staff resources permit social services, including social-psychological evaluations, predisposition reports, treatment, probation, and aftercare services when requested by the judge of a juvenile court.

To provide insofar as staff resources permit social services, including social-psychological evaluations, predisposition reports, treatment, and probation and parole services, when requested by the judge in a criminal case.

To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the supplemental nutrition assistance program and to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that program. The department with the consent of the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session may terminate the program if the rate of federal financial participation in administrative costs provided under Public Law 93-347 is decreased or limited, or if the state or counties become financially responsible for all or a portion of the coupon bonus payments under the Food Stamp Act. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9. The department may not deny assistance under the supplemental nutrition assistance program to any individual who has been convicted of a felony offense that has as an element the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance as defined in section 102(6) of the Controlled Substances Act [21 U.S.C. 802(6)].

To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the making of direct cash assistance payments, housing stabilization supports, and rental assistance and to promote cooperation and working agreements with public agencies including the housing finance agency and department of commerce, and private human services agencies.

To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the home energy assistance program; to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that program; and to take such actions, give such directions, and adopt such rules, subject to review in the courts of this state, as may be necessary or desirable to carry out this subsection. For purposes of the administration of the energy assistance program, funds are obligated at the earlier of the time a written commitment is made to pay a vendor or contractor for services or supplies delivered or to be delivered, or at the time payment is made to a vendor or contractor for services or supplies delivered or to be delivered. The provisions of this subsection concerning obligation of funds apply to payments and commitments made on or after July 1, 1991. The department with the consent of the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session may terminate the program if the rate of federal financial participation in administrative costs is decreased or limited to less than fifty percent of total administrative costs, or if the state or counties become financially responsible for all or a portion of the cost of energy assistance program benefits. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9.

To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the payment of the cost of the special needs of any child under the age of twenty-one years, who is living in an adoptive home and would probably go without adoption except for acceptance by the adopted family, and whose adopted family does not have the economic ability and resources, as established by the department, to take care of the special needs of the child, including legal fees, maintenance costs, medical and dental expenses, travel costs, and other costs incidental to the care of the child.

To exercise and carry out any other powers and duties granted the department under state law.

To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the payment of supervised independent living services, to develop standards regarding a supervised independent living program, to approve supervised independent living services for the purpose of providing foster care placement, and to apply for and administer federal and other funds that may be made available to undertake any of the activities described in this subsection.

With the approval of the governor, to lease or transfer use of any part of the life skills and transition center facilities or properties, located in section thirteen, township one hundred fifty-seven north, range fifty-three west, located in Walsh County, North Dakota, to the federal government, or any public or private agency, organization, or business enterprise, or any worthy undertaking, under the following provisions:

The department determines that the facility or property is not needed to serve any present or reasonably foreseeable need of the life skills and transition center.

The transaction is exempt from the provisions of section 50-06-06.6.

The term of any lease may not exceed ninety-nine years.

All required legal documents, papers, and instruments in any transaction must be reviewed and approved as to form and legality by the attorney general.

Any funds realized by any transaction must be deposited in the state’s general fund.

To act as a decedent’s successor for purposes of collecting amounts due to the department or human service zone, unless otherwise directed or determined by the department. Any affidavit submitted by the department under section 30.1-23-01 must conform to the requirements of that section except that the affidavit may state that twenty days have elapsed since the death of the decedent.

To provide those services necessary for the department and for human service zones to comply with the provisions of any law, rule, order, or regulation of the United States or any federal agency or authority requiring civil service or merit standards or classifications as a condition for providing funds administered by the department.

For purposes of administration of programs, and subject to legislative appropriation, funds are obligated at the time a written commitment is made to pay a vendor or contractor for services or supplies either delivered or to be delivered. This subsection applies to payments and commitments made on or after January 1, 1997.

To determine eligibility for medical assistance and children’s health insurance program benefits when the department receives a joint application for these benefits.

To develop a system of services and supports to provide behavioral health services and supports in the community for children at risk of or identified as having a behavioral health condition and for the families of these children. This system must include early intervention, treatment, and recovery services and supports and must interface with, but not include, child protective services or juvenile court.

To provide resources on mental health awareness and suicide prevention to the behavioral health resource coordinator at each school. The resources must include information on identifying warning signs, risk factors, and the availability of resources in the community.

To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for kinship care services and payments and services in response to the federal Family First Prevention Services Act as part of the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2018 [Pub. L. 115-123].

To contract with another human service zone or any other public or private person to discharge any of the department’s duties or exercise any of the department’s powers to administer human services.

To act on behalf of the department of public instruction to administer part B, section 619 of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act [Pub. L. 108-446; 229 Stat. 2647; 20 U.S.C. 1411 et seq.].

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 466, § 5; 1975, ch. 440, § 3; 1977, ch. 450, § 1; 1981, ch. 484, § 2; 1981, ch. 486, § 21; 1983, ch. 82, § 95; 1985, ch. 522, § 1; 1987, ch. 571, § 1; 1987, ch. 582, § 30; 1989, ch. 575, § 4; 1991, ch. 328, § 8; 1991, ch. 509, § 3; 1993, ch. 2, § 15; 1993, ch. 472, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, §§ 10, 11, 14; 1995, ch. 120, § 25; 1995, ch. 457, § 3; 1995, ch. 460, § 1; 1995, ch. 461, § 6; 1997, ch. 136, § 2; 1997, ch. 403, § 9; 2005, ch. 407, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2011, ch. 54, § 8; 2013, ch. 367, § 5; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 108, § 16, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 331, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 81, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 394, §§ 1, 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 404, § 4, effective October 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 438, §§
10, 11, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 356, § 1, effective April 23, 2021; 2021, ch. 357, § 1, effective April 23, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 36, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 358, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

50-06-05.2.
Regional human service centers — Licensure.

Human services must be delivered through regional human service centers in the areas designated by the governor's executive order 1978-12 dated October 5, 1978. The department shall request appropriations and resources sufficient for accreditation and to ensure maintenance of the accreditation for the regional human service centers, including associated facilities, by the council on accreditation or by a similar national accrediting body accepted by the department. The regional human service centers are subject to licensing by the department. The department may use the accreditation as a basis for licensing in lieu of adopted rules for the operation of the regional human service centers. The department shall adopt rules for the operation of the regional human service centers. A human service center may not operate without a license issued in accordance with this section. Regional human service centers are authorized to receive federal and other funds available to finance, in whole or in part, the services and operations of the centers.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 4; 1987, ch. 73, § 30; 2017, ch. 331, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 353, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 359, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 50-06-05.2 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 353, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2039; and Section 4 of Chapter 331, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1136.

50-06-05.3.
Regional human service centers — Powers — Duties — Human service advisory groups.

Regional human service centers shall provide human services to all eligible individuals and families to help individuals and families achieve or maintain social, emotional, and economic self-sufficiency by providing human services to:

Prevent, reduce, or eliminate dependency;

Prevent or remedy the neglect, abuse, or exploitation of children and of adults unable to protect their own interests;

Aid in the preservation, rehabilitation, and reuniting of families;

Prevent or reduce inappropriate institutional care by providing for care while institutionalized or providing for community-based or other forms of less restrictive care;

Secure referral or admission for institutional care;

Provide outpatient diagnostic and treatment services;

Provide information concerning guardianship to people interested in becoming or who are guardians; and

Provide rehabilitation and crisis services for patients with mental, emotional, or substance use disorders, an intellectual disability, and other psychiatric conditions, particularly for those patients who have received prior treatment in an inpatient facility.

Regional human service centers shall deliver services in the manner prescribed by the department.

Each human service center must have a human services advisory group consisting of the human service zone directors of the region served, the public health directors of the region served, two current county commissioners appointed by the executive director of the department, and five additional members appointed by the executive director of the department. Each advisory group member must be a resident of the region the member is appointed to serve. The term of office for each appointed member is two years and arranged so that the term of three of the appointed members expires at the end of the first year and the term of the remaining four appointed members expires at the end of the second year, except for those first members appointed, three members shall serve a one-year term and four members shall serve a two-year term. The director shall select the appointed members of each human service advisory group on the basis of population of the counties in the region served by the human service center. Each county in the region must be represented by at least one member on the human service advisory group. To the extent possible, appointed membership of the advisory group must reflect regional interests in the fields of developmental disabilities, social services, mental health, and substance use disorders. The executive director of the department shall appoint a chairman for each advisory group from the membership of the advisory group. The executive director of the department shall fill a vacancy occurring within an advisory group for other than the expiration of a term in the same manner as original appointments, except that appointments must be made only for the unexpired term. The department shall compensate appointed members of a human service advisory group at the rate of forty-five dollars per day, not to exceed twenty-five days in any one year. The department also shall pay members for mileage and actual expenses incurred in attending meetings and in the performance of their official duties in the amounts provided by law for other state officers.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 428, § 1; 1981, ch. 486, § 32; 1983, ch. 313, § 14; 1987, ch. 73, § 31; 2011, ch. 207, § 21; 2013, ch. 368, § 1; 2017, ch. 331, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 353, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 82, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 368, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 21 of chapter 207, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

Note.

Section 50-06-05.3 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 353, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2039; and Section 5 of Chapter 331, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1136.

50-06-05.4.
Duties of human service advisory groups.

Each human service advisory group of the regional human service centers shall perform the following duties:

Provide information to the department relative to needs assessment and the planning and development of health and social resources for the effective and efficient delivery of high-quality human services fully accessible to all citizens.

Review services and programs provided by the regional human service centers and make periodic recommendations for improvement in services, programs, or facilities.

Promote cooperation and working agreements with public agencies, including public health and corrections and private human service agencies.

Promote local and regional financing from public and private sources.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 33; 2013, ch. 368, § 2; 2017, ch. 353, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 368, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

50-06-05.5.
Director of regional center — Medical director.

Each regional human service center must be headed by a regional director appointed by the executive director of the department. The regional director must be accountable to the executive director or the director’s designee. Each regional director may employ the staff necessary to discharge the center’s responsibilities. A regional director, subject to the approval of the executive director of the department or the director’s designee, and within the limit of legislative appropriations, may make contractual arrangements with public or private agencies or with individuals and organizations to discharge the regional human service center’s service delivery responsibilities. Each regional director shall hire a qualified medical professional who must be designated as the medical director of the center. The medical director is responsible for coordinating mental health and medically related services. The medical director’s position may be part time or full time as determined appropriate by the regional director, with the concurrence of the executive director or the director’s designee. As used in this section, “qualified medical professional” means a board-eligible or board-certified psychiatrist, when such an individual can be employed, and when this is not possible, an individual possessing at least a medical degree.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 5; 2013, ch. 368, § 3; 2017, ch. 331, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 368, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

50-06-05.6.
Committee on aging — Appointment — Expenses.

There is hereby established a committee on aging. The governor shall appoint each committee member for a term of three years, staggered so that the terms of one-third of the members of the committee expire July first of each year, except that initial appointments to the committee must be made on the basis of a one-year term for one-third of the members of the committee; a two-year term for one-third of the members of the committee; and a full three-year term for the remaining members of the committee. A vacancy occurring other than by reason of the expiration of a term must be filled in the same manner as original appointments, except that the appointment may be made for only the remainder of the unexpired term. The members must be paid for mileage and actual expenses incurred in attending meetings and in performance of their official duties in amounts provided by law for other state officers.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 458, § 3.

50-06-05.7.
Multicounty agreement to administer social service programs — Selection of regional administration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 408, § 1; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 139, effective January 1, 2020.

50-06-05.8.
Department to assume costs of human services.

The department shall pay each human service zone’s expenses for administering human services for calendar years after December 31, 2019, based on the payment amount calculated for each human service zone under chapter 50-35. The executive director of the department shall authorize expenditures from the human service finance fund to reimburse the department for the department’s costs of providing human services that historically have been provided by a county or human service zone, or for a new service or program based on federal or state law.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 329, § 4, effective January 1, 2016; 2017, ch. 341, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 341, § 5, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 391, § 83, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 353, § 14, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015.

50-06-06.
Powers and duties of the board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 466, § 8.

50-06-06.1.
Indians — General assistance contract authorized. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 327, § 1; 1995, ch. 456, § 19; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 139, effective January 1, 2020.

50-06-06.2.
Clinic services — Provider qualification — Utilization of federal funds.

Within the limits of legislative appropriation therefor and in accordance with rules established by the department, the department may defray the costs of preventive diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, or palliative items or services furnished medical assistance eligible individuals by regional human service centers or designated behavioral health providers. Within the limits of legislative appropriations and to the extent permitted by state and federal law and regulations established thereunder, it is the intent of the legislative assembly that federal funds available under title XIX of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.] be utilized to defray the costs of identifiable mental health clinic services furnished eligible individuals in regional human service centers and that federal funds available under title XX of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1397 et seq.] be utilized to defray the costs of identifiable human services furnished to eligible individuals by human service zones and regional human service centers.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 338, § 2; 1981, ch. 486, § 22; 2017, ch. 57, § 7, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 353, § 6, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 84, effective January 1, 2020.

Note.

Section 50-06-06.2 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 353, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2039; and Section 7 of Chapter 57, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1043.

50-06-06.3.
Facility staff training. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the department of human services design and implement a facility staff training system in cooperation with the board of higher education to assure adequate and appropriate staff development and training for the providers of community-based care on behalf of individuals with developmental disabilities.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 62, § 7; 1991, ch. 592, § 26; 2015, ch. 200, § 32, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 32 of chapter 200, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

50-06-06.3.
Facility staff training. [Effective September 1, 2022]

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the department design and implement a facility staff training system in cooperation with the board of higher education to assure adequate and appropriate staff development and training for the providers of community-based care on behalf of individuals with developmental disabilities.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 62, § 7; 1991, ch. 592, § 26; 2015, ch. 200, § 32, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 385, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-06.4.
Comprehensive community residential program. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the department of human services implement a comprehensive community residential program for children with developmental disabilities, including the use of intermediate care facilities and other such foster home and group home resources as deemed appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 62, § 8; 2015, ch. 200, § 33, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 33 of chapter 200, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

50-06-06.4.
Comprehensive community residential program. [Effective September 1, 2022]

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the department implement a comprehensive community residential program for children with developmental disabilities, including the use of intermediate care facilities and other such foster home and group home resources as deemed appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 62, § 8; 2015, ch. 200, § 33, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 386, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-06.5.
Continuum of services for individuals with serious and persistent mental illness.

The department shall develop a plan for an integrated, multidisciplinary continuum of services for individuals with serious and persistent mental illness. The continuum may consist of an array of services provided by private mental health professionals, private agencies, human service zones, human service centers, community-based residential care and treatment facilities, and private and public inpatient psychiatric hospitals. When appropriate, access to the continuum must be through human service centers. Within the limits of legislative appropriations, the plan for a continuum may include:

Programs, and appropriate related facilities, to provide socialization skills.

Programs, and appropriate related facilities, to provide basic living skills.

Appropriate residential facilities and other housing options.

Appropriate training, placement, and support to enhance potential for employment.

Appropriate delivery and control of necessary medication.

Appropriate economic assistance.

An inpatient facility with appropriate programs to respond to persons who require hospitalization.

Peer and recovery support.

Crisis service that is available twenty-four hours a day seven days a week.

The continuum of care must provide that a person requiring treatment be submitted to the least restrictive available conditions necessary to achieve the purposes of treatment. The department shall ensure appropriate cooperation with human service zones and private providers in achieving the continuum of care.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 572, § 1; 2017, ch. 332, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 353, § 7, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 85, effective January 1, 2020.

Note.

Section 50-06-06.5 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 7 of Chapter 353, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2039; and Section 5 of Chapter 332, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1117.

50-06-06.6.
Department of human services may lease real and personal property. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The executive director of the department of human services may lease surplus farm and pastureland at the state hospital and the life skills and transition center. The executive director also may enter into further leases of real or personal property at the life skills and transition center or the state hospital upon a specific finding that the granting of each such leasehold interest will result in a net economic gain for the department, taking into account all identifiable costs. Any lease of space for the purpose of providing child care services must meet requirements as determined by the department. The executive director may prescribe the terms and conditions of any leases entered into pursuant to this section and may renew existing leases. Any lease entered into must be subject to renewal or cancelable each biennium.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 29, § 9; 1993, ch. 473, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 11; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 331, § 7, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

50-06-06.6.
Department may lease real and personal property. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The executive director of the department may lease surplus farm and pastureland at the state hospital and the life skills and transition center. The executive director also may enter into further leases of real or personal property at the life skills and transition center or the state hospital upon a specific finding that the granting of each such leasehold interest will result in a net economic gain for the department, taking into account all identifiable costs. Any lease of space for the purpose of providing child care services must meet requirements as determined by the department. The executive director may prescribe the terms and conditions of any leases entered into pursuant to this section and may renew existing leases. Any lease entered into must be subject to renewal or cancelable each biennium.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 29, § 9; 1993, ch. 473, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 11; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 331, § 7, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 387, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-06.7.
Sale of surplus steam heat — Terms — Not to be construed as the distribution of heat.

The department, with the approval of the governor, is authorized but not required to determine if surplus steam heat is or may be produced at the life skills and transition center, and to sell any surplus steam heat to the city of Grafton. The sale may be on such terms and conditions as may be deemed necessary by the department, provided that no sale may be made for less than the cost of producing the surplus steam heat. A sale of steam heat, if made by the department to the city of Grafton, may not be construed as the distribution of heat under title 49.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 29, § 12; 2013, ch. 226, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

50-06-06.8.
Administration of child care block grant and at-risk child care programs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 78.

50-06-06.9.
Insurance payments by the department.

Notwithstanding any other eligibility requirements for human services programs, the department, pursuant to rules adopted by the department, may pay health insurance premiums, copayments, and deductibles for a person with human immunodeficiency virus infection, or for any person maintaining a health insurance policy covering a person with human immunodeficiency virus infection if:

The payment of premiums, copayments, and deductibles is determined to be a cost-effective alternative to the payment of future medical assistance and economic assistance costs for that person; and

The department determines that the person is otherwise unable to afford the cost of the premiums, copayments, and deductibles.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 29, § 14; 1997, ch. 405, § 1.

50-06-06.10.
Family life education program. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall enter into an agreement with the North Dakota state university extension service for the design of a program to educate and support individuals at all points within the family life cycle. The program must provide support for families and youth with research-based information relating to personal, family, and community concerns and must contain a research component aimed at evaluation of planned methods or programs for prevention of family and social problems. The program must address the following inter-related topics:

Child and youth development.

Parent education with an emphasis on parents as educators.

Human development.

Interpersonal relationships.

Family interaction and family systems.

Family economics.

Intergenerational issues.

Impact of societal changes on the family.

Coping skills.

Community networks and supports for families.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 509, § 2.

Note.

Section 1 of chapter 509, S.L. 1991, provides:

“

Statement of legislative policy.

The state must advocate for the family by using political, economic, social, and judicial measures that support the unity and stability of the family so that the family can exercise its specific function of nurturing and protecting its members. If the family is to be nurtured and its members protected, the state must support programs that offer assistance for pregnant women and their families. Unjust social and economic structures such as poverty, sexism, and lack of adequate health care and information should be addressed. Women must have the ability to make responsible decisions concerning a pregnancy without losing other opportunities for a fulfilled life. Ensuring the dignity and rights of women and children and families is the operative principle underlying this Act.”

50-06-06.10.
Family life education program. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall enter into an agreement with the North Dakota state university extension service for the design of a program to educate and support individuals at all points within the family life cycle. The program must provide support for families and youth with research-based information relating to personal, family, and community concerns and must contain a research component aimed at evaluation of planned methods or programs for prevention of family and social problems. The program must address the following inter-related topics:

Child and youth development.

Parent education with an emphasis on parents as educators.

Human development.

Interpersonal relationships.

Family interaction and family systems.

Family economics.

Intergenerational issues.

Impact of societal changes on the family.

Coping skills.

Community networks and supports for families.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 509, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 388, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-06.11.
Child care provider payments. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Within the limits of federal regulations, the department of human services, at the election of the early childhood facility, shall directly pay early childhood facilities monthly under child care assistance programs administered by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 474, § 1; 1995, ch. 462, § 1.

50-06-06.11.
Child care provider payments. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Within the limits of federal regulations, the department, at the election of the early childhood facility, shall directly pay early childhood facilities monthly under child care assistance programs administered by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 474, § 1; 1995, ch. 462, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 389, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-06.12.
Child care provider reimbursement system. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 462, § 2.

50-06-06.13.
Treatment services for children with serious emotional disorders.

The department shall establish a program to provide out-of-home treatment services for a Medicaid-eligible child with a serious emotional disorder. The department may not require a parent or legal guardian to transfer legal custody of the child in order to have the child placed in an out-of-home treatment program if the sole reason for the placement is the need to obtain services for the child’s emotional or behavioral problems. With departmental approval, a parent with legal and physical custody of the child may obtain treatment services for the child through the program. A parent without physical custody of a child, who disagrees with a child’s treatment under this section, may request a judicial determination regarding the child’s treatment.

The department may establish a program to prevent out-of-home placement for a Medicaid-eligible child with a behavior health condition as defined in the “Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders”, American psychiatric association, fifth edition, text revision (2013).

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 300, § 2; 1997, ch. 406, § 1; 2001, ch. 419, § 1; 2003, ch. 409, § 1; 2019, ch. 396, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

50-06-06.14.
Placement of children — Least restrictive care.

The department and human service zones shall explore the option of kinship care if a child is unable to return home due to safety concerns. Absent kinship options, the department and human service zones shall provide permanency options that are in the least restrictive care and near the family’s home as required by the federal Adoption and Safe Family Act of 1997 [Pub. L. 105-89; 111 Stat. 2115; 42 U.S.C. 671].

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 353, § 8, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 86, effective January 1, 2020.